Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1102
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the definitions in sections 77-1103 to 77-1112.02 apply.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB682, § 3.